Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1710
Fee.

A city council, village board of trustees, or county board of commissioners or supervisors shall charge an applicant for siting approval a fee in an amount equal to the reasonable and necessary costs incurred by the city, village, or county in the siting approval process.

Laws 1991, LB 813, § 10.